Hawaii statutes.
§655-3 Money in court, deposit as ordered
by the court. Whenever any money is paid into, or deposited in any court
to abide the ascertainment of the right to the money, or the termination of the
action, the court shall have power, upon the application of any party
interested, or without such application, to order the money to be deposited in
the treasury of the State or as otherwise ordered, subject to the further order
of the court. [L 1862, p 32; RL 1925, §2385; RL 1935, §4119; RL 1945, §10233;
RL 1955, §243-3; HRS §655-3; am L 1972, c 89, §6(b)]

Cross References

Interest income; court deposits, see §601-18.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next